Alabama, session 2026rs, HB317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-6-271, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-271
(a)(1) A firefighter, upon application and subject to
this division, may be issued a distinctive motor vehicle
license plate as identification as a firefighter. In addition
to the proper numbers, words, and insignias used on the
standard license plate issued for motor vehicles, the
firefighter distinctive license plates issued to firefighters
shall bear a red Maltese cross emblem on each side to the left
and right of the regular tag numbers. The words "Fire Fighter"
should be centered at the bottom of the license plate.
(2)a. A fire chaplain, who is a member of the Alabama
Fellowship of Fire Chaplains, upon application and subject to
this division, may be issued one firefighter distinctive
license plate.
b. Proof of service as a fire chaplain shall be
verified by an affidavit signed by the President of the
Alabama Fellowship of Fire Chaplains attesting that the
applicant is a member in good standing of that organization
Page 1

applicant is a member in good standing of that organization
HB317 Enrolled
and is eligible to receive the firefighter distinctive license
plate. An individual who is no longer a member in good
standing of the Alabama Fellowship of Fire Chaplains is
ineligible to receive the firefighter distinctive license
plate.
(b) In addition to any other fees provided for by law,
an annual additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) ($1) is added
to the cost of the firefighter distinctive license plate
provided for in this division, effective January 1, 2022. The
annual additional fee collected pursuant to this section shall
be distributed by each licensing official to the state
Comptroller,. The state Comptroller who shall distribute the
net proceeds monthly as follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($.50)($0.50) shall be deposited into a
fund managed by the Alabama Joint Fire Council and shall be
used for the purpose of expanding and maintaining the Alabama
Firefighter Memorial located in Tuscaloosa.
(2) Fifty cents ($.50)($0.50) shall be distributed to
the Alabama Joint Fire Council to be used for expenses
associated with the Firefighter Peer Support Program.
(c) The funds generated by this fee shall be subject to
audit from either the Department of Examiners of Public
Accounts or an independent certified public accountant once
every three calendar years effective January 1, 2022.
(d) The firefighter distinctive license plates issued
under this section shall be used only upon and for personally
owned, private passenger vehicles registered in the name of
the applicant and, when issued, shall be used only upon the
Page 2

the applicant and, when issued, shall be used only upon the
HB317 Enrolled
vehicles for which they are issued in lieu of the standard
license plates normally issued for the vehicles.
(e) Any individual who is proven to have falsely
obtained or falsely certified an individual to obtain a
firefighter distinctive license plate issued under this
section shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(f) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to
administer this section."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 3

1, 2027.
HB317 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 24-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed



Page 4